North Dakota, session 69, HB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 61-04-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
61-04-14. Extending time for application to beneficial use.
The department of water resources may extend the time for the application of water to the
beneficial use cited in the conditional water permit for good cause shown. When the time has expired,
the department may renew and extend the time upon application. However, a conditional water permit,
or any portion of the applicationpermit must be considered forfeited if no request for renewal is received
by the department within sixty days after the date the permitholder is informed the period for applying
water to the beneficial use cited in the conditional water permit has expired. If a request to extend the
time for application to beneficial use for any conditional water permit, or portion of the permit, is denied,
the conditional water permit, or portion of the permit, must be considered forfeited. Sections 61-04-23
through 61-04-25 do not apply to this section.

H. B. NO. 1042 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1042.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State